Louisiana, session 2026, HB739.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1921(D), 1924(B), 1925(B), 1961, 1962(introductory paragraph),
1963, and 1968 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1962(G) is hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§1921. Purpose and powers
* * *
D. If during the course of the investigation, the office of insurance fraud
determines that there may be a violation of criminal law, the office shall turn the
matter over to the Department of Justice; the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, public safety services, office of state police; and any other appropriate
law enforcement or prosecutorial agency, for further investigation, enforcement, or
prosecution. However, with the consent of the law enforcement or prosecutorial
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 739 ENROLLED
agency, the office of insurance fraud may assist the law enforcement or prosecutorial
agency in its investigation.
* * *
§1924. Prohibited activities and sanctions
* * *
B. The Unless otherwise provided by law, the criminal provisions of this
Section shall be investigated, enforced, or prosecuted only by the proper law
enforcement and prosecutorial agencies.
* * *
§1925. Automobile insurance policies
* * *
B. The Unless otherwise provided by law, the criminal provisions of this
Section shall be investigated, enforced, or prosecuted only by the proper law
enforcement and prosecutorial agencies.
* * *
§1961. Purpose
The purpose of this Part is to regulate the trade practices and affairs of any
person engaged in the business of insurance, in accordance with the intent of
congress as expressed in Public Law 15-79th Congress*, by defining or providing
for the determination of all acts, methods, and practices which constitute unfair
methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts and practices in this state, and
to prohibit the same.
§1962. Definitions
When used in this Part: For purposes of this Part, the following definitions
apply:
* * *
G.(1) "Business of insurance" means any of the following:
(a) An action concerning the sale, advertisement, or solicitation of a contract
or policy of insurance.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 739 ENROLLED
(b) Aiding in the resolution of a claim or benefit under an insurance policy
involving an insurer or a person who acts on behalf of an insurer, directly or
indirectly, and an insured, claimant, or any person who acts on behalf of an insured
or claimant, directly or indirectly.
(2) "Business of insurance" does not mean an attorney actively providing
legal services on behalf of a client or a healthcare provider or its representative
assisting a patient with a prior authorization or appeal concerning the denial of
healthcare services provided by a duly licensed healthcare provider.
§1963. Unfair methods and unfair or deceptive acts and practices prohibited
No person shall engage in this state in any trade practice which is or act
affecting the business of insurance as defined in this Part to be an unfair method of
competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of the business
of insurance, including unauthorized insurance as provided in R.S. 22:1902 et seq.
or the failure to maintain professional liability insurance, if such coverage is required
pursuant to R.S. 22:1570.1.
* * *
§1968. Notice of hearing
A. If the commissioner has reason to believe that any person licensed by the
department has been engaged or is engaging in this state in any unfair trade practice
as defined in this Code, whether or not defined in this Part, the commissioner shall
issue a notice of wrongful conduct to that person in accordance and compliance with
R.S. 49:977.3 describing the unfair trade practice and citing the law which is deemed
by the commissioner to be violated.
B. If the commissioner has reason to believe that any person not licensed by
the department has engaged or is engaging in the business of insurance in this state
and committed or is committing any unfair trade practice as defined in this Part, the
commissioner may issue a cease and desist order, issue a fine, or take any other
action against the person pursuant to R.S. 22:1961 et seq.
C. Any person not licensed by the commissioner who has been aggrieved by
any act, cease and desist order, fine, order, or any other action of the commissioner
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 739 ENROLLED
pursuant to R.S. 22:1961 et seq., may appeal in accordance with the provisions of
R.S. 22:2191 et seq.
D. The commissioner may promulgate and adopt rules in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to provide means of electronic delivery of the
notice required in this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.